Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; VETERANS AFFAIRS; STILLWATER VETERANS MEMORIAL.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to Stillwater Veterans Memorial to expand a veterans' memorial in Stillwater Veterans Memorial Park in the city of Stillwater. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end